Massachusetts, session 194th, H3277.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23K of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all revenue
received by a municipality from a category 1 licensee in the form of property tax payments
pursuant to chapters 59 and 60 or payments made in lieu of taxes pursuant to a community host
agreement or a contract or agreement executed pursuant to chapter 121A between the
municipality and the category 1 licensee shall be expended equally among all the wards or
precincts of that municipality to fund projects that provide for public safety facilities and
personnel; promote economic development; or, improve infrastructure within each particular
ward or precinct of that municipality.
of 2

Annually, the Mayor shall present to the City Council a specific line item appropriation
pursuant to SECTION 72 for each of the Wards of the municipality for the public services
contained within.
of 2